Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 8
ALLOCATION OF QUALIFIED MORTGAGE BONDS

29-4-801 to 29-4-811. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:

Entire part repealed, p. 997, § 2, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This part 8 was added in 1982. For amendments to this part 8 prior to its repeal in 1987, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.